Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.050

Effect of registration—Right of state to terminate—Governing law.

(1) A registered foreign corporation may transact business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to terminate the registration as provided in Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) A foreign corporation registered to transact business in this state is subject to RCW 23.95.500 relating to the effect of registration and the governing law for registered foreign corporations.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2134; 1989 c 165 s 173.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.